installation/solr-6.x/kramerius/cs_CZ_ascii.aff
SFX A   ci          hla        oc[it]
SFX A   ci          hlo        oc[it]
SFX A   ci          hli        oc[it]
SFX A   ci          hly        oc[it]
SFX A   ci          ha         oc[it]
SFX A   ci          houc       oc[it]
SFX A   ci          houce      oc[it]
SFX A   ovat        uji        ovat
SFX A   ovat        ujes       ovat
SFX A   ovat        uje        ovat
SFX A   ovat        ujeme      ovat
SFX A   ovat        ujete      ovat
SFX A   ovat        uji        ovat
SFX A   ovat        uj         ovat
SFX A   ovat        ujte       ovat
SFX A   ovat        ujme       ovat
SFX A   ovat        ujic       ovat
SFX A   ovat        ujice      ovat
SFX A   at          u          [^o]vat
SFX A   at          es         [^o]vat
SFX A   at          e          [^o]vat
SFX A   at          eme        [^o]vat
SFX A   at          ete        [^o]vat
SFX A   at          ou         [^o]vat
SFX A   at          0          avat
SFX A   at          me         avat
SFX A   at          te         avat
SFX A   t           je         avat
SFX A   t           jic        avat
SFX A   t           jice       avat
SFX A   at          i          [^aio]vat
SFX A   at          eme        [^aio]vat
SFX A   at          ete        [^aio]vat
SFX A   zat         zu         zat
SFX A   zat         zes        zat
SFX A   zat         ze         zat
SFX A   zat         zeme       zat
SFX A   zat         zete       zat
SFX A   zat         zou        zat
SFX A   zat         z          [^aiu]zat
SFX A   zat         zme        [^aiu]zat
SFX A   zat         zte        [^aiu]zat
SFX A   azat        az         azat
SFX A   azat        azme       azat
SFX A   azat        azte       azat
SFX A   izat        iz         izat
SFX A   izat        izme       izat
SFX A   izat        izte       izat
SFX A   at          ej         uzat
SFX A   at          ejme       uzat
SFX A   at          ejte       uzat
SFX A   zat         zic        [^aiu]zat
SFX A   zat         zice       [^aiu]zat
SFX A   t           je         [yu]zat
SFX A   t           jic        [yu]zat
SFX A   t           jice       [yu]zat
SFX A   sat         su         sat
SFX A   sat         ses        sat
SFX A   sat         se         sat
SFX A   sat         seme       sat
SFX A   sat         sete       sat
SFX A   sat         sou        sat
SFX A   sat         s          sat
SFX A   sat         sme        sat
SFX A   sat         ste        sat
SFX A   sat         sic        sat
SFX A   sat         sice       sat
SFX A   rat         eru        rat
SFX A   rat         eres       rat
SFX A   rat         ere        rat
SFX A   rat         ereme      rat
SFX A   rat         erete      rat
SFX A   rat         erou       rat
SFX A   rat         er         rat
SFX A   rat         erme       rat
SFX A   rat         erte       rat
SFX A   rat         era        rat
SFX A   rat         erouc      rat
SFX A   rat         erouce     rat
SFX A   akat        acu        akat
SFX A   akat        aces       akat
SFX A   akat        ace        akat
SFX A   akat        aceme      akat
SFX A   akat        acete      akat
SFX A   akat        acou       akat
SFX A   akat        ac         akat
SFX A   akat        acme       akat
SFX A   akat        acte       akat
SFX A   akat        acic       akat
SFX A   akat        acice      akat
SFX A   kat         cu         [^a]kat
SFX A   kat         ces        [^a]kat
SFX A   kat         ce         [^a]kat
SFX A   kat         ceme       [^a]kat
SFX A   kat         cete       [^a]kat
SFX A   kat         cou        [^a]kat
SFX A   at          ej         kat
SFX A   at          ejme       kat
SFX A   at          ejte       kat
SFX A   at          u          [^krsvz]at
SFX A   at          es         [^krsvz]at
SFX A   at          e          [^krsvz]at
SFX A   at          eme        [^krsvz]at
SFX A   at          ete        [^krsvz]at
SFX A   at          ou         [^krsvz]at
SFX A   at          0          [aeiye][^krsvz]at
SFX A   at          me         [aeiye][^krsvz]at
SFX A   at          te         [aeiye][^krsvz]at
SFX A   at          0          [^o]u[^rsvz]at
SFX A   at          me         [^o]u[^rsvz]at
SFX A   at          te         [^o]u[^rsvz]at
SFX A   t           je         [^rvz]at
SFX A   t           jic        [^rvz]at
SFX A   t           jice       [^rvz]at
SFX A   at          i          [csz][bmp]at
SFX A   at          eme        [csz][bmp]at
SFX A   at          ete        [csz][bmp]at
SFX A   t           n          stat
SFX A   t           nme        stat
SFX A   t           nte        stat
SFX A   at          ej         [^csz][bmp]at
SFX A   at          ejme       [^csz][bmp]at
SFX A   at          ejte       [^csz][bmp]at
SFX A   at          ej         [^rsvzbmpt]at
SFX A   at          ejme       [^rsvzbmpt]at
SFX A   at          ejte       [^rsvzbmpt]at
SFX A   at          i          slat
SFX A   t           l          [^aiouyycsz]t
SFX A   t           la         [^aiouyycsz]t
SFX A   t           lo         [^aiouyycsz]t
SFX A   t           li         [^aiouyycsz]t
SFX A   t           ly         [^aiouyycsz]t
SFX A   it          im         it
SFX A   it          is         it
SFX A   it          i          it
SFX A   it          ime        it
SFX A   it          ite        it
SFX A   it          e          [dtnbfpmv]it
SFX A   it          e          [^dtnbfpmv]it
SFX A   it          ic         it
SFX A   it          ice        it
SFX A   it          0          [^o]ucit
SFX A   it          me         [^o]ucit
SFX A   it          te         [^o]ucit
SFX A   oubit       ub         oubit
SFX A   oubit       ubme       oubit
SFX A   oubit       ubte       oubit
SFX A   oucit       uc         oucit
SFX A   oucit       ucme       oucit
SFX A   oucit       ucte       oucit
SFX A   dit         d          [^o]udit
SFX A   dit         dme        [^o]udit
SFX A   dit         dte        [^o]udit
SFX A   oudit       ud         oudit
SFX A   oudit       udme       oudit
SFX A   oudit       udte       oudit
SFX A   t           0          [lr]oudit
SFX A   it          eme        [lr]oudit
SFX A   it          ete        [lr]oudit
SFX A   oulit       ul         oulit
SFX A   oulit       ulme       oulit
SFX A   oulit       ulte       oulit
SFX A   ounit       ouni       ounit
SFX A   ounit       ouneme     ounit
SFX A   ounit       ounete     ounit
SFX A   ouzit       up         oupit
SFX A   ouzit       upme       oupit
SFX A   ouzit       upte       oupit
SFX A   ourit       ur         ourit
SFX A   ourit       urme       ourit
SFX A   ourit       urte       ourit
SFX A   ousit       us         ousit
SFX A   ousit       usme       ousit
SFX A   ousit       uste       ousit
SFX A   outit       ut         outit
SFX A   outit       utme       outit
SFX A   outit       utte       outit
SFX A   ouzit       uz         ouzit
SFX A   ouzit       uzme       ouzit
SFX A   ouzit       uzte       ouzit
SFX A   t           0          souzit
SFX A   it          eme        souzit
SFX A   it          ete        souzit
SFX A   ulit        ul         ulit
SFX A   ulit        ulme       ulit
SFX A   ulit        ulte       ulit
SFX A   uzit        uz         uzit
SFX A   uzit        uzme       uzit
SFX A   uzit        uzte       uzit
SFX A   it          0          [aeioye][bccfjlmprssvzz]it
SFX A   it          me         [aeioye][bccfjlmprssvzz]it
SFX A   it          te         [aeioye][bccfjlmprssvzz]it
SFX A   t           0          [^aeiouyaeiouuyer][ccjlrsszz]it
SFX A   it          eme        [^aeiouyaeiouuyer][ccjlrsszz]it
SFX A   it          ete        [^aeiouyaeiouuyer][ccjlrsszz]it
SFX A   t           0          [^aeiouyaeiouuye][bfmpv]it
SFX A   it          eme        [^aeiouyaeiouuye][bfmpv]it
SFX A   it          ete        [^aeiouyaeiouuye][bfmpv]it
SFX A   it          0          r[bm]it
SFX A   it          me         r[bm]it
SFX A   it          te         r[bm]it
SFX A   it          0          [^o]u[bccfjlmprssvzz]it
SFX A   it          me         [^o]u[bccfjlmprssvzz]it
