installation/solr-6.x/kramerius/cs_CZ_ascii.dic
aktualizovat/ATN
aproximovat/ATN
bagrovat/ATN
bilit/ATN
bombirovat/ATN
brichatet/AJN
cibebovatet/AJN
cvrknout/ATN
clenit/ATN
defraudovat/ATN
demokratizovat/ATN
desifrovat/ATN
disociovat/ATN
dobasnit/ATN
docilovat/ATN
dodrat/ATN
dogenerovat/ATN
dohrnovat/ATN
dojit/ATN
dokoncovat/ATN
dokrucet/AN
dolepovat/ATN
domarnit/ATN
domystifikovat/ATN
doparfemovat/ATN
dopochodovat/ATN
dopulsovat/AN
dorvat/ATN
doskocit/AN
dostacit/AN
dosycet/ATN
dosroubovat/ATN
dotlacit/ATN
doutocit/AN
dovozovat/ATN
dozorovat/ATN
driftovat/AN
dymit/AN
excerpovat/ATN
favorizovat/ATN
formovat/ATN
gilosovat/ATN
hanobit/ATN
hloubit/ATN
hospitovat/AN
hrmotit/AN
chcipnout/AN
chrupat/AJTN
indikovat/ATN
interagovat/AN
jankovatet/AN
kamenovat/ATN
kecnout/AN
klofnout/ATN
kolacionovat/ATN
koncit/ATN
konvergovat/ATN
kostovat/ATN
kriminalizovat/ATN
krizkovat/ATN
kvapit/ATN
lanarit/AN
liberalisovat/ATN
lopotit/AN
manevrovat/ATN
meliorovat/ATN
mlknout/AN
mrstit/ATN
nabajit/ATN
nacyklostylovat/ATN
nadhazovat/ATN
nadrit/ATN
nahlednout/ATXN
nainstalovat/ATN
nakombinovat/ATN
nakresat/AJTN
naletnout/AN
namest/ATN
naostrovat/ATN
naplnovat/ATN
naprimit/ATN
narknout/ACTN
nasmradit/ATN
nastudit/ACN
naspendlit/ATN
natrapit/ATN
navigovat/ATN
naznacovat/ATN
nopovat/ATN
obesit/ACN
obklusat/AJN
oblizovat/ATN
obrodit/ACN
obtect/ATN
ocarkovat/ATN
odbouchnout/ATN
oddechovat/ATN
odfotografovat/ATN
odhrnout/ATN
odklidit/ACN
odkrokovat/ATN
odlezet/ATN
odmerit/ATN
odoperovat/ATN
odplevelit/ATN
odprosit/ATN
odradit/ACTN
odsouhlasit/ATN
odsupet/ATN
odtajit/ATN
odusevnit/ATN
odvodit/ACN
ofotit/ACN
ohryzat/AJTN
oklamat/ATN
okrikovat/ATN
omazat/ATN
opalisovat/ATN
oplest/ATN
opravovat/ATN
orvat/ATN
oslyset/ATN
osvezit/ATN
otelit/ATN
overit/ATN
oznamovat/ATN
palickovat/ATN
pasirovat/ATN
perforovat/ATN
planout/AN
poanglictit/ATN
pocit/ATN
podhustit/ACN
podmest/ATN
podradovat/ATN
podtrhnout/ACN
pohltit/ACN
pochodit/AN
pokonversovat/AN
pokusit/AN
politovat/ATN
pomrznout/ATN
popadnout/AN
poprat/AN
porvat/AN
posouzit/ATN
posukovat/ATN
potazat/AN
poutracet/AJTN
povyskocit/AN
pozrusovat/ATN
prefixovat/ATN
procedit/ACN
producirovat/AN
prohnist/AN
prokalkulovat/ATN
prokrajovat/ATN
prolomit/ATN
promodulovat/ATN
proplest/ATN
prorvat/AN
prostehovat/ATN
proskrtnout/ATN
protlacovat/ATN
provirit/ATN
prystit/ATN
precarnout/AN
predformovat/ATN
prednastavit/ATN
predskocit/AN
predvazovat/ATN
prehlednout/ATXN
preinstrumentovat/ATN
prekorenit/ATN
prekvasit/ACN
prelobovat/ATN
premyslit/ACN
preplatit/ACN
prerazet/AJTN
preskakat/ATN
prestrihovat/ATN
prespendlovat/ATN
pretrenovat/ATN
prevezt/ATN
prezrat/ATN
pridelovat/ATN
prikapnout/ATN
prikrmovat/ATN
primastovat/ATN
pripazovat/ATN
pripravit/ATN
prislibovat/ATN
prisvedcit/ATN
pritlacit/ATN
privinovat/ATN
pudovat/ATN
raftovat/AN
refinancovat/ATN
relativizovat/ATN
restovat/ATN
rojit/ATN
rozbrednout/AN
rozdobat/AJTN
rozestavit/ATN
rozhorcovat/ATN
rozklinovat/ATN
rozkricet/ATN
rozlucovat/ATN
rozmoknout/ATN
rozpect/ATN
rozprchnout/ATN
rozredovat/ATN
rozsvitit/ACN
roztancit/ATN
rozuzlit/ATN
rozvlnit/ATN
ruinovat/ATN
ridnout/AN
sbrousit/ACN
segregovat/ATN
sesict/AN
sesikovat/ATN
schematizovat/ATN
skloubit/ATN
sliznout/ATN
smet/AJN
snizovat/ATN
spocinout/AN
srocovat/AN
stravit/ATN
svarovat/ATN
satit/ACN
spiclovat/ATN
tect/AN
transferovat/ATN
turovat/ATN
udobrit/ATN
uklepat/AJTN
umastit/ACN
uplanovat/ATN
usednout/AN
ustrelovat/ATN
utopit/ATN
uzdravit/ATN
vemluvit/ATN
vkopnout/ATN
vozit/ACN
vsunout/ATN
vybourit/ATN
vyderovat/ATN
vyhecovat/ATN
vychytracit/ATN
vykouzlit/ATN
vylizat/AJTN
vymrit/AN
vyplaznout/ATN
vypujcovat/ATN
vysklit/ATN
vystruzovat/ATN
vyspulit/ATN
vytridit/ATN
vyvysit/ATN
vzlyknout/AN
zablysknout/AN
zacist/ATN
zahazet/AJTN
zachranovat/ATN
zaknucet/AN
zakupovat/ATN
zamenovat/ATN
zaostrovat/ATN
zaprazit/ATN
zariznout/ATN
zastrasit/ATN
zasroubovat/ATN
zatrpytit/AN
zavodnovat/ATN
zbidacovat/ATN
zdelit/ATN
zefektivnit/ATN
zglajchsaltovat/ATN
zchvatit/ACN
zklihovatet/ATN
zkrotnout/AN
zmalatnet/AJN
zmutovat/ATN
zneprijemnit/ATN
zobrazit/ATN
zpodobit/ATN
zprznit/ATN
zrezirovat/ATN
ztropit/ATN
zversovat/ATN
zivit/ATN
